California, session 20252026, AB585.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 102778 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102778. (a)  On or before January 1, 2005, the department shall implement an Internet-based internet-based electronic death registration system for the creation, storage, and transfer of death registration information.(b)  The electronic death registration system implemented pursuant to this section shall protect the proper use of the death registration information created, stored, and transferred within the system.(c)  The electronic death registration system that is implemented pursuant to this section shall be subject to any limitation placed on the accessibility and release of personally identifying information contained in those death records by any other provision of law or subsequently enacted legislation.(d) In addition to the individuals currently responsible for completing a certificate of death and the required contents under this article, the electronic death registration system shall be accessible by health care providers, including physicians, medical examiners, and local registrars.SEC. 2. Section 102785 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:102785. (a) The State Registrar, at his or her discretion, may incorporate computer or telephone facsimile technology, or both, in Registrar shall use updated technology, including computer and mobile telephone applications, to upgrade the statewide program of death and fetal death registration, including, but not limited to, the issuing of permits for disposition of human remains.Nothing in this section shall(b) This section does not limit the ability of local districts to file certificates of death and fetal death manually within the local registration districts.